Nebraska, session 109, LB1138.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 10 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation
Act.
Sec. 2. (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide legal
protection to insurers and insurance producers so that they have the
discretion to take action to assist in detecting and preventing financial
exploitation.
(2) The Legislature recognizes that insurers and insurance producers
are in a unique position to potentially discover financial exploitation
when conducting transactions on behalf of and at the request of their
customers.
(3) The Legislature recognizes that insurers and insurance producers
have duties imposed by contract and duties imposed by both federal and
state law to conduct transactions requested by their customers faithfully
and timely in accordance with the customer's instructions.
(4) The Legislature recognizes that insurers and insurance producers
do not have a duty to contravene the valid instructions of their
customers and nothing in the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from
Insurance Exploitation Act creates such a duty.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from
Insurance Exploitation Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Director means the Director of Insurance;
(2) Disbursement means any attempt to withdraw money or access a
benefit from a life insurance policy or an annuity irrespective of
whether the request is classified as a surrender, loan, withdrawal,
partial withdrawal, accelerated benefit, or otherwise;
(3) Eligible adult means:
(a) A senior adult as defined in section 28-366.01; or
(b) A vulnerable adult as defined in section 28-371.
(4) Financial exploitation means:
(a) The wrongful or unauthorized taking, withholding, appropriation,
-2-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
or use of money, assets, or other property of an eligible adult by any
person; or
(b) Any act or omission taken by a person, including through the use
of a power of attorney, guardianship, or conservatorship of an eligible
adult, to:
(i) Obtain control, through deception, intimidation, or undue
influence, over the eligible adult's money, assets, or other property to
deprive the eligible adult of the ownership, use, benefit, or possession
of his or her money, assets, or other property; or
(ii) Convert money, assets, or other property of the eligible adult
to deprive such eligible adult of the ownership, use, benefit, or
possession of his or her money, assets, or other property;
(5) Permissible third party means any individual previously
designated by the eligible adult who may be contacted about the eligible
adult's insurance policy, contract, or account, or a person otherwise
permitted to be contacted by any state or federal law, rule, or
regulation; and
(6) Trained individual means any of the following:
(a) An insurance producer who has taken at least two hours of
continuing education focused on how to identify the suspected or
attempted financial exploitation of an eligible adult, which included
identifying common signs indicating the financial exploitation of an
eligible adult and how to provide notification regarding the suspected or
attempted financial exploitation of an eligible adult; or
(b) A person who has received training pursuant to section 8 of this
act.
Sec. 4. An insurer or trained individual who, acting reasonably and
in good faith, makes a disclosure of information to the director pursuant
to the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act or
the Insurance Fraud Act shall be immune from administrative or civil
liability that might otherwise arise from such disclosure or for any
-3-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
failure to notify the eligible adult of the disclosure. This section
shall not abrogate or modify any existing statutory or common law
privileges or immunities.
Sec. 5. (1) If an insurer or trained individual reasonably believes
financial exploitation of an eligible adult may have occurred, has been
attempted, or is being attempted, the insurer or trained individual may
notify a permissible third party. Notification to a permissible third
party is not required prior to any insurer's, trained individual's,
director's, or relevant agency's review or investigation of financial
exploitation.
(2) Insurers and trained individuals shall not notify a permissible
third party if the insurer or trained individual reasonably suspects that
such permissible third party has financially exploited or otherwise
abused the eligible adult.
(3) An insurer or trained individual who, acting reasonably and in
good faith, complies with this section shall be immune from any
administrative or civil liability that might otherwise arise from such
notification.
Sec. 6. (1) If an insurer or trained individual reasonably believes
a disbursement or transaction will likely result in or contribute to the
financial exploitation of an eligible adult, the insurer or trained
individual may initiate an internal review of the requested disbursement
or transaction.
(2) An insurer may delay a disbursement or transaction from an
eligible adult's insurance policy, contract, or account on which an
eligible adult is a beneficiary if all of the following apply:
(a) The insurer reasonably believes, after an internal review is
initiated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, that the requested
disbursement or transaction will likely result in or contribute to the
financial exploitation of an eligible adult;
(b) Immediately, but in no event more than seven business days after
-4-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
the disbursement or transaction is delayed, the insurer provides written
notification of the delay and the reason for the delay to all persons
authorized to transact business on the insurance policy, contract, or
account. An insurer shall not notify a person authorized to transact
business on the insurance policy, contract, or account if the insurer
reasonably believes such person has committed or attempted financial
exploitation or other abuse of an eligible adult or committed or
attempted insurance fraud;
(c) Within seven business days after the disbursement or transaction
is delayed, the insurer notifies the director of the delay and provides
to the director the reason for the delay, including the status of the
internal review initiated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section; and
(d) The insurer continues the internal review of the suspected or
attempted financial exploitation of the eligible adult, as necessary, and
provides the director with updates of such review upon request.
(3) Any delay of a disbursement or transaction authorized by this
section shall expire upon the first to occur of any of the following:
(a) A final determination by the insurer that the disbursement or
transaction will not result in or contribute to financial exploitation of
the eligible adult;
(b) Fifteen business days after the date on which the insurer first
delayed the disbursement or transaction, unless extended pursuant to
subdivision (3)(c) or (3)(d) of this section;
(c) If the internal review initiated pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section continues to support the insurer's reasonable belief that
the disbursement or transaction will likely result in or contribute to
the financial exploitation of an eligible adult, twenty-five business
days after the date on which the insurer first delayed the disbursement
or the transaction, unless extended pursuant to subdivision (3)(d) of
this section; or
(d) If the internal review initiated pursuant to subsection (1) of
-5-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
this section continues to support the insurer's reasonable belief that
the disbursement or transaction will likely result in or contribute to
the financial exploitation of an eligible adult, fifty-five business days
after the date on which the insurer first delayed the disbursement or
transaction.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, upon the
petition of the director, an insurer who initiated a delay of
disbursement or transaction pursuant to this section, or another
interested party, a court of competent jurisdiction may enter an order
terminating, extending, or modifying the delay of the disbursement or
transaction and may order other protective relief.
Sec. 7. (1) An insurer or trained individual who, acting reasonably
and in good faith, complies with section 6 of this act or the Insurance
Fraud Act shall be immune from any administrative or civil liability that
might otherwise arise from such delay in a disbursement or transaction or
any other actions or omissions related to the administration of Nebraska
Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act. An insurer or
trained individual shall not be liable for the actions of a permissible
third party.
(2) An insurer or trained individual shall be immune from any civil,
criminal, or administrative liability for declining to interact with a
permissible third party if the insurer or trained individual reasonably
believes that:
(a) The permissible third party is, may be, or may have been engaged
in the financial exploitation of the vulnerable adult or senior adult; or
(b) Such interaction is not in the best interests of the vulnerable
adult or senior adult.
(3) A permissible third party who acts in good faith and exercises
reasonable care in providing information to the insurer or trained
individual, or in assisting the insurer, trained individual, or law
enforcement in an investigation of suspected financial exploitation,
-6-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
shall be immune from any administrative, civil, or criminal liability
that might otherwise arise from such actions.
Sec. 8. (1) Except for insurance producers described in subdivision
(6)(a) of section 3 of this act, an insurer shall provide training to all
supervisors and employees of such insurer appropriate to the job
responsibilities of supervisors and employees handling or advising on
complaints, possible fraud, and investigations. Such training shall be
completed by the later of April 15, 2027, or one year after the date any
supervisor or employee begins employment with or becomes affiliated or
associated with the insurer. The training shall include all of the
following:
(a) Instruction on how to identify the suspected or attempted
exploitation of an eligible adult, including identifying common signs
indicating the financial exploitation of an eligible adult, and how to
provide notification regarding the suspected or attempted exploitation of
an eligible adult; and
(b) Instruction regarding privacy and confidentiality requirements.
(2) An insurer shall provide the training required by this section
as soon as reasonably practicable.
Sec. 9. (1) An insurer shall provide access to or copies of records
that are relevant to the suspected or attempted financial exploitation of
an eligible adult to the director and to law enforcement, either as part
of a referral to the director or law enforcement, or upon the request of
the director or law enforcement pursuant to an investigation. The records
may include historical records as well as records relating to the most
recent transactions and disbursement requests from the insurance policy,
contract, or account that may comprise financial exploitation of an
eligible adult.
(2) All records made available to the director or law enforcement or
any other person pursuant to this section, including the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and
-7-

LB1138 LB1138
2026 2026
subsidiaries, in the course of an investigation conducted under the
Nebraska Protection of Seniors from Insurance Exploitation Act, shall be
confidential, shall not be subject to subpoena, shall not be made public
by the director or any other person, and shall not be public records
subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. Such
workpapers, recorded information, documents, and copies may be provided
to other state, federal, foreign, and international regulatory and law
enforcement agencies and the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries if the recipient agrees
in writing to maintain the confidentiality of such workpapers, recorded
information, documents, and copies.
Sec. 10. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Nebraska Protection of Seniors from
Insurance Exploitation Act, including, but not limited to, rules and
regulations related to:
(1) The form and manner of the notifications under section 6 of this
act; and
(2) The specific content and methods of the training required under
section 8 of this act.
-8-